Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3877
(UTC 812) Collecting trust property.

(UTC 812) A trustee shall take reasonable steps to compel a former trustee or other person to deliver trust property to the trustee, and to redress a breach of trust known to the trustee to have been committed by a former trustee.

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 77.